Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 2. Manufacturer Licenses.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.020.
Brewery manufacturer license.

A brewery manufacturer license authorizes the holder to operate a brewery for the manufacture, packaging, storing, and sale of its brewed beverages to a buyer as permitted in AS

04.09.050

.

The biennial brewery manufacturer license fee is $1,250.

The fermentation process of all brewed beverages offered for sale by the holder of a brewery manufacturer license must occur on the holder’s licensed premises in the state.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.030.
Winery manufacturer license.

A winery manufacturer license authorizes the holder to operate a winery for the manufacture, packaging, storing, and sale of its wine to a buyer as permitted in AS

04.09.050

.

The biennial winery manufacturer license fee is $1,000.

The fermentation process of all wine offered for sale by the holder of a winery manufacturer license must occur on the holder’s licensed premises in the state.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.040.
Distillery manufacturer license.

A distillery manufacturer license authorizes the holder to operate a distillery for the manufacture, packaging, storing, and sale of its distilled spirits to a buyer as permitted in AS

04.09.050

.

The biennial distillery manufacturer license fee is $1,250.

At least 80 percent of each final product that contains distilled spirits offered for sale by the holder of a distillery manufacturer license must be manufactured on the holder’s licensed premises in the state.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.050.
Authorized sales.

The holder of a manufacturer license that annually produces in total less than 300,000 barrels of brewed beverages or mead or cider containing less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume, less than 50,000 nine- liter-equivalent cases of wine, sake, or mead or cider containing 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume, or less than 50,000 nine-liter-equivalent cases of distilled spirits may sell its product to

the holder of a wholesale license issued under this chapter;

the holder of a retail license issued under this chapter;

the holder of a permit issued under this chapter;

an entity in another state or country.

The holder of a manufacturer license that annually produces in total 300,000 barrels or more of brewed beverages or mead or cider containing less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume, 50,000 nine-liter-equivalent cases or more of wine, sake, or mead or cider containing 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume, or 50,000 nine- liter-equivalent cases or more of distilled spirits may sell its product to

the holder of a wholesale license issued under this chapter;

an entity in another state or country.

For purposes of calculating the volume that the holder of a manufacturer license produces under this section, the volume of production must include all production by

the holder of the manufacturer license; and

an officer, director, agent, employee, or affiliate of the holder; in this paragraph, “affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a corporation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.060.
Unlicensed manufacturing.

A person commits the crime of unlicensed manufacturing if the person knowingly operates a

brewery without a brewery manufacturer license;

winery without a winery manufacturer license; or

distillery without a distillery manufacturer license.

Unlicensed manufacturing is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.080.
Unauthorized manufacturer sale.

Except as provided in AS

04.09.320

—

04.09.340

, a person who holds a manufacturer license commits the offense of unauthorized manufacturer sale if the person sells its product in violation of AS

04.09.050

.

Unauthorized manufacturer sale is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.090.
Definition.

In AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.090

, “packaging” means the process of containing alcoholic beverages in bottles or other types of containers for the purpose of resale.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)